Washington statutes.
RCW 13.90.050

Motion for modification—Motion for appointment of a new guardian.

(1) The youth may move the court to modify the provisions of a vulnerable youth guardianship order at any time by: (a) Filing with the court a motion for modification and an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested modification; and (b) providing notice and a copy of the motion and affidavit to the other party. The nonmoving party may file and serve opposing affidavits.

(2) The youth may move the court to appoint a new guardian at any time by: (a) Filing with the court a motion for appointment of a new guardian and an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested appointment; and (b) providing notice and a copy of the motion and affidavit to the other party.

(3) The youth may move the court to substitute a new guardian, provided that the proposed new guardian is a suitable adult over twenty-one years old who is capable of performing the duties of a guardian as stated in RCW 13.90.040. The substitution of a new guardian must be permitted without termination of the vulnerable youth guardianship and the youth is not required to file a new vulnerable youth guardianship petition to substitute a guardian.

(4) If a party other than the youth moves the court to modify the provisions of a vulnerable youth guardianship order, the modification is subject to the youth's agreement.

[ 2017 c 279 s 7.]